Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1413
Child born out of wedlock; term substituted for other terms.

In any local law, ordinance or resolution, or in any public or judicial proceeding, or in any process, notice, order, decree, judgment, record or other public document or paper, the terms bastard or illegitimate child shall not be used but the term child born out of wedlock shall be used in substitution therefor and with the same force and effect.

Laws 1941, c. 81, § 14, p. 326;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-714;

R.S.1943, § 13-115;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 13-115.